Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1597
Regional housing agency; commissioners; appointment.

When the governing bodies of two or more political subdivisions have determined by resolution or ordinance pursuant to section 71-1581 to establish and participate in a regional housing agency, the chief elected officials of such political subdivisions or, if no such official exists for a participating political subdivision, then the governing body thereof, shall appoint adult persons who shall be residents of the area of operation of the regional housing agency. Such persons so appointed shall constitute the governing body of the regional housing agency and shall be called commissioners. The number of commissioners who shall be appointed by each participating political subdivision shall be as agreed upon by the participating political subdivisions.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 26.